Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8071.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-65. Background check for ammunition purchase or transfer.
(a) Except for sales or transfers to active law enforcement officers, no person shall sell,
transfer or deliver any ammunition, shotgun shells, gun powder, primer, bullets or ammunition
loading components to any person unless the seller or transferor first submits to and receives from
the state police, a municipal law enforcement agency or the National Instant Criminal Background
Check System, a completed background check for the purchaser or transferee.
(b) No ammunition shall be sold or transferred to any person prohibited by law from
possession of a firearm or ammunition to include, but not be limited to, the provisions of §§ 11-47-
5, 11-47-6, 11-47-7, 11-47-23, 11-47-30 or 11-47-31.
(c) No person shall possess ammunition who is prohibited by law from possessing a
firearm. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment
for up to one year or fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(d) Upon receipt of a background check documenting no disqualifying information, the
seller or transferor may sell or transfer the ammunition or ammunition components to the purchaser
or transferee.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to bona fide sales at wholesale to licensed
retail dealers.

(f) Any seller or transferee violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a
fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005712
========
LC005712 - Page 2 of 3